Utah statutes.
73-2-11.   Records -- Certified copies -- Evidence.

He shall keep on file in his office full and proper records of his work, including all field notes, computations and facts made or collected by him, all of which shall be part of the records of his office and the property of the state. All records, maps and papers recorded or filed in the office of the state engineer shall be open to the public during business hours. The office of the state engineer is hereby declared to be an office of public record, and none of the files, records or documents shall be removed therefrom, except in the custody of the state engineer or one of his deputies. Certified copies of any record or document shall be furnished by the state engineer on demand, upon payment of the reasonable cost of making the same, together with the legal fee for certification. Such copies shall be competent evidence, and shall have the same force and effect as the originals.

